Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-739
Rights of accused person; violation; penalty.

Any officer who shall deliver to the agent for extradition of the demanding state a person in his custody under the Governor's warrant, in willful disobedience to section 29-738, shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1963, c. 159, § 11, p. 561;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 112.